Maryland, session 2025, HB1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
11–906.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “CONSUMER GOOD” MEANS A GOOD THAT IS INTENDED
PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, HOUSEHOLD, FAMILY, OR AGRICULTURAL USE.
(II) “CONSUMER GOOD” INCLUDES:
1. A MOTOR VEHICLE;
2. AN APPLIANCE; AND
3. ANY OTHER TANGIBLE PRODUCT.
(3) “ENERGY SOURCE” INCLUDES:
(I) ELECTRICITY;
(II) GASOLINE;
(III) NATURAL GAS;
(IV) PROPANE; AND
(V) ANY OTHER FUEL SOURCE AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL
LAW.

HOUSE BILL 1258 3
(B) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT MAY NOT
RESTRICT THE SALE, PURCHASE, OR USE OF ANY CONSUMER GOOD SOLELY ON THE
BASIS OF THE ENERGY SOURCE USED TO POWER THE CONSUMER GOOD.
Article – Environment
[Subtitle 11. Low Emissions Vehicle Program.]
[2–1101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(c) “Program” means the low emissions vehicle program established under this
subtitle.
(d) “Transfer” includes acquire, purchase, sell, and lease.]
[2–1102.
(a) In consultation with the Administration and as provided under this subtitle,
the Department shall establish by regulation and maintain a low emissions vehicle
program that:
(1) Is authorized by § 177 of the federal Clean Air Act; and
(2) Is applicable to vehicles of the 2011 model year and each model year
thereafter.
(b) As part of the program, the Department shall establish new motor vehicle
emissions standards and compliance requirements for each model year included in the
program as authorized by § 177 of the federal Clean Air Act.
(c) As part of the compliance requirements established under this subtitle, the
Department may adopt by regulation motor vehicle emissions inspection, recall, and
warranty requirements.
(d) The Department or any other State agency may not adopt a regulation under
this subtitle or any other provision of law that requires the sale or use of California
reformulated gasoline in the State.]
[2–1103.

HOUSE BILL 1258
To minimize the administrative impact of the program and to minimize the impact
of motor vehicle emissions generated out of state on the air quality of this State, the
Department:
(1) May adopt California regulations, procedures, and certification data by
reference; and
(2) May work in cooperation with, and enter into contracts or agreements
with, California, other states, and the District of Columbia to administer certification,
in–use compliance, inspection, recall, and warranty requirements for the program.]
[2–1103.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Heavy–duty vehicle” means a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight
rating equal to or greater than 14,001 pounds.
(3) “Medium–duty vehicle” means a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight
rating of not less than 8,501 pounds and not more than 14,000 pounds.
(b) (1) On or before December 1, 2023, the Department shall adopt regulations
establishing requirements for the sale of new zero–emission medium– and heavy–duty
vehicles in the State.
(2) The regulations adopted under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(i) Update existing regulations;
(ii) Incorporate by reference the California Air Resources Board’s
Advanced Clean Trucks regulations, as revised and updated; and
(iii) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, take effect starting with
model year 2027.
(c) (1) The Department, in consultation with the Department of
Transportation, the Department of General Services, the Maryland Energy
Administration, and the Public Service Commission, shall prepare a needs assessment and
deployment plan relating to the successful implementation of regulations adopted under
this section.
(2) The needs assessment and deployment plan shall assess and plan for:
(i) The additional electrical capacity, transmission, distribution
demands, and hydrogen fueling demands that will result from implementation of the
regulations, and the ability of the State’s electric utilities, grid, and hydrogen

HOUSE BILL 1258 5
infrastructure to meet those demands, based on publicly available information and existing
analyses;
(ii) The number of zero–emission medium– and heavy–duty vehicle
recharging and refueling stations recommended for implementation of the regulations, and
the costs, permitting processes, and timelines for installing those stations;
(iii) The purchase incentives and other mechanisms recommended
for successful implementation of the regulations, including incentives for recharging and
refueling stations and related infrastructure, and the existing and potential sources of
funding for those incentives and mechanisms; and
(iv) The timeline, economic feasibility, and models available for
transitioning medium– and heavy–duty vehicles in the State vehicle fleet, including
State–contracted medium– and heavy–duty vehicles, to zero–emission vehicles.
(3) On or before December 1, 2024, the Department shall submit the needs
assessment and deployment plan to the General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article.
(d) The Department may delay implementation of the regulations authorized
under this section by one or more model years if, after consulting with the Department of
Transportation, the Department of General Services, the Maryland Energy
Administration, and the Public Service Commission, the Department determines, based on
criteria identified through the needs assessment and deployment plan, that
implementation of the regulations is not yet feasible.]
[2–1104.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the Administration may not title
or register, under Title 13 of the Transportation Article, a new motor vehicle that is subject
to the provisions of this subtitle if the motor vehicle does not comply with the provisions of
this subtitle or any regulation adopted under this subtitle.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a person may not transfer or
attempt to transfer a motor vehicle or motor vehicle engine that is subject to the provisions
of this subtitle if the vehicle or engine does not comply with the program.
(c) A person may not procure or attempt to procure, through fraud or
misrepresentation, the title or registration of a motor vehicle that is subject to the
provisions of this subtitle if the vehicle does not comply with the program.
(d) The Department, in consultation with the Administration, may adopt
regulations to prohibit the transfer of new motor vehicles or motor vehicle engines that are
not in compliance with the provisions of this subtitle.]
[2–1105.

HOUSE BILL 1258
(a) The Department shall, in consultation with the Administration, adopt
regulations to exempt motor vehicles from the program.
(b) Exemptions established under subsection (a) of this section shall be limited
to:
(1) Motor vehicles sold for registration out of the State;
(2) Motor vehicles sold from a licensed dealer to another licensed dealer;
and
(3) Motor vehicles that would be exempted from the low emissions vehicle
program established under California law.
(c) For any motor vehicle exempted under subsection (a) of this section, the
Administration shall note the exemption on the title of the motor vehicle.]
[2–1106.
(a) The enforcement and penalty provisions of Subtitle 6 of this title shall apply
to a violation of this subtitle.
(b) Each transfer or attempted transfer of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle engine
in violation of § 2–1104(b) of this subtitle shall constitute a separate violation of the
provisions of this subtitle.]
Article – Transportation
13–110.
The Administration shall refuse to issue a certificate of title of a vehicle if:
(5) The Administration has reasonable grounds to believe:
(i) That the applicant is not the owner of the vehicle; OR
(ii) That the issuance of a certificate of title to the applicant would
be a fraud against another person[; or
(iii) That the vehicle does not comply with Title 2, Subtitle 11 of the
Environment Article or any regulation adopted under that subtitle].
13–406.

HOUSE BILL 1258 7
The Administration shall refuse to register or transfer the registration of any vehicle
if:
(9) The Administration has reasonable grounds to believe:
(i) That the vehicle is stolen; OR
(ii) That the grant or transfer of registration would be a fraud
against another person; or
[(iii) That the vehicle does not comply with Title 2, Subtitle 11 of the
Environment Article or any regulations adopted under that subtitle; or]
(10) The gross vehicle weight is 55,000 pounds or over and the applicant has
failed to furnish proof of payment of the Federal Heavy Vehicle Use Tax.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect State and local
restrictions adopted before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.